Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 2. Funding

§ 26-2-201.
Deposit of fees.

The state treasurer shall place all fees received by the commissioner as provided in W.S. 26-2-205(c) in the state general fund.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 62, § 1.

§ 26-2-202.
Expenditures of the department.

The state treasurer shall make payments on warrants drawn by the state auditor, upon vouchers issued and signed by the commissioner or his designee, for expenditures required to carry out the functions of the department pursuant to the appropriations authorized the department by law.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 62, § 1.

§ 26-2-203.
Agents' licensing program exempt. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 62, § 1; repealed by 2017 ch. 9, § 3, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 26-2-204.
Insurers assessed for department expenditures.

In addition to any other tax, license or fee imposed by law, each authorized insurer shall pay to the commissioner on or before June 1 of each year a fee for the privilege of transacting the business of insurance in this state, computed as follows:

On or before April 1 of each year, the commissioner, with the governor’s approval, shall estimate the expenditures of the department for the fiscal year commencing July 1, including the expense of any regularly scheduled association, zone, triannual or similar periodic statutorily scheduled financial examination of any authorized insurer, provided that neither the actual expenditures nor estimated expenditures of a fiscal year within the same biennial budget for the department shall not exceed the amount appropriated to the department by law; and

The commissioner shall then divide the estimated amount of expenditures, after deducting therefrom any expected unexpended funds in the account of the insurance department, by the total number of insurers then authorized to transact insurance in this state as of December 31 of the immediately preceding year. The result of this computation is the amount of the fee the commissioner shall assess each insurer.

Upon receiving a statement of assessment from the commissioner, each authorized insurer shall promptly pay the fee to the commissioner.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 62, § 1.

§ 26-2-205.
Time for payment; penalties.

If any insurer does not pay the assessment on or before June 1 of the year in which assessed or as otherwise ordered pursuant to W.S.

26-2-208

, the assessment is delinquent. If the assessment is delinquent, the commissioner may suspend or revoke the insurer’s certificate of authority.

The suspension shall continue until the assessment is paid together with an additional fee of ten dollars ($10.00) for each day the fee remains delinquent after June 1. The penalty for late payment is in addition to any other penalties provided by this code.

The commissioner shall deposit all sums collected under this section with the state treasurer for credit to the general fund.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 62, § 1.

Meaning of “this code.” —

For the definition of “this code,” referred to in this section, see § 26-1-102(a)(xxxii).

§ 26-2-206.
Newly authorized insurers.

Any insurer becoming first authorized after December 31 shall pay to the commissioner the amount determined pursuant to W.S.

26-2-204

prior to the commissioner issuing it a certificate of authority. The commissioner shall deposit the fee as provided by W.S.

26-2-204

.

This section does not apply to any insurer first authorized after December 31, 1987, but before March 31, 1988.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 62, § 1.

§ 26-2-207.
Other powers unaffected.

Nothing in this article alters or amends the commissioner’s authority, obligations or duties under W.S.

26-2-116

through

26-2-125

, nor does this article exempt an insurer examined by the department pursuant to W.S.

26-2-116

(b) from the payments required under W.S. 26-2-122(b).

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 62, § 1.

§ 26-2-208.
Additional assessment authorized.

If it appears to the commissioner that the total amount of assessments actually collected will not equal the authorized expenditures of the department for any biennial appropriation period, with the governor’s approval, he shall make any additional assessments upon authorized insurers which will eliminate the deficiency. Any additional assessments are subject to all provisions of this article as if they were original assessments under W.S.

26-2-204

.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 62, § 1.

§ 26-2-209.
Deduction allowed for retaliation.

Notwithstanding any other law, if any domestic insurer is required to pay additional taxes or fees to some other jurisdiction because of this article under the color of a retaliatory statute or other similar law, the insurer may deduct the additional taxes or fees from the premium taxes otherwise payable under W.S.

26-4-103

.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 62, § 1; 1990, ch. 19, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

deleted “and

26-4-104

” at the end.

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”